Texas statutes.
PROPERTY CODE

TITLE 5. EXEMPT PROPERTY AND LIENS

SUBTITLE A. PROPERTY EXEMPT FROM CREDITORS' CLAIMS

CHAPTER 44. TAXATION OF RETIREMENT BENEFITS BY ANOTHER STATE

Sec. 44.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "pension or other retirement plan" includes:

(1) an annuity, pension, or profit-sharing or stock bonus or similar plan established to provide retirement benefits for an officer or employee of a public or private employer or for a self-employed individual;

(2) an annuity, pension, or military retirement pay plan or other retirement plan administered by the United States; and

(3) an individual retirement account.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 95, Sec. 1, eff. May 7, 1993.

Sec. 44.002. PROPERTY EXEMPT. All property in this state is exempt from attachment, execution, and seizure for the satisfaction of a judgment or claim in favor of another state or political subdivision of another state for failure to pay that state's or that political subdivision's income tax on benefits received from a pension or other retirement plan.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 95, Sec. 1, eff. May 7, 1993.

Sec. 44.003. LIEN NOT CREATED. A claim or judgment in favor of another state or political subdivision of another state for failure to pay that state's or that political subdivision's income tax on benefits received from a pension or other retirement plan may not be a lien on any property in this state owned by a resident of this state.

Added by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 95, Sec. 1, eff. May 7, 1993.